Idaho, session 2026, H0877.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation
for the Council for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Program $2,100 from the Gen-
eral Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.